Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3915
Proceedings in more than one state.

Except for
a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency or issuance of
a protective order limited to property located in this state under subdivision
(1)(a) or (b) of section 30-3910, if a petition for the appointment of a guardian
or issuance of a protective order is filed in this state and in another state
and neither petition has been dismissed or withdrawn, the following rules
apply:

(1) If the
court in this state has jurisdiction under section 30-3909, it may proceed
with the case unless a court in another state acquires jurisdiction under
provisions similar to section 30-3909 before the appointment or issuance of
the order; and

(2) If the court in this state does not have jurisdiction under
section 30-3909, whether at the time the petition is filed or at any time
before the appointment or issuance of the order, the court shall stay the
proceeding and communicate with the court in the other state. If the court
in the other state has jurisdiction, the court in this state shall dismiss
the petition unless the court in the other state determines that the court
in this state is a more appropriate forum.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 19.